Utah statutes.
72-10-113.   Pilot's certificate of competency required -- Exceptions.

(1) A person may not pilot within this state any civil aircraft unless that person is the holder of a currently effective pilot's certificate of competency issued by the government of the United States.

(2)  This restriction does not apply to any person operating any aircraft licensed by a foreign country with which the United States has a reciprocal agreement covering the operation of the licensed aircraft.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

